Hawaii, session 2026, SB2576.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that agricultural theft and vandalism are on the rise in the State, with some estimates putting the cost at upwards of $14 million when accounting for the cost of the crime and preventing it.  In addition to the financial burden, agricultural theft and vandalism also pose a threat to the safety of farmers and ranchers in the State, as many trespassers on agricultural lands are armed to illegally hunt game.  Confrontations between trespassers and farmers can turn deadly, for example the death of Cranston "Duke" Pia in 2024, who was shot while protecting his livestock from a trespasser's hunting dogs. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to prohibit persons prosecuted for or convicted of the crime of criminal trespass on agricultural land from owning, possessing, or controlling a firearm or ammunition. SECTION 2.  Section 134-7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  No person who is being prosecuted for one or more charges for a felony, a crime of violence, a criminal offense relating to firearms, criminal trespass on agricultural land under section 708-823.2, or an illegal sale or distribution of any drug in a court in this State or elsewhere, or who has been convicted in this State or elsewhere of having committed a felony, a crime of violence, a criminal offense relating to firearms, criminal trespass on agricultural land under section 708-823.2, or an illegal sale or distribution of any drug shall own, possess, or control any firearm or ammunition. SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________